src/orthography/Cyrl-to-Latn.xfscript
! Script for Cyrillic to Latin for Tatar
! Source: ISO-9 in
! http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tatar_alphabet

define smalla а -> a ;
define smallae ә -> ä ;
define smallb б -> b ;
define smallv в -> v ;
define smallg г -> g ;
define smalld д -> d ;
define smallje е -> e ;
define smalljo ё -> ë ;
define smallzh ж -> ž ;
define smallzhd җ -> ẓ̌ ;
define smallz з -> z ;
define smalli и -> i ;
define smallj й -> j ;
define smallk к -> k ;
define smalll л -> l ;
define smallm м -> m ;
define smalln н -> n ;
define smallnj ң -> ņ ;
define smallo о -> o ;
define smalloo ө -> ô ;
define smallp п -> p ;
define smallr р -> r ;
define smalls с -> s ;
define smallt т -> t ;
define smallu у -> u ;
define smalluu ү -> ù ;
define smallf ф -> f ;
define smallx х -> h ;
define smallh һ -> ḩ ;
define smallc ц -> c ;
define smallch ч -> č ;
define smallsh ш -> š ;
define smallshj щ -> ŝ ;
define smallhard ъ -> ” ;
define smally  ы -> y ;
define smallsoft ь -> ’ ;
define smalle  э -> è ;
define smallju ю -> û ;
define smallja я -> â ;

define capitala А -> A ;
define capitalae Ә -> Ä ;
define capitalb Б -> B ;
define capitalv В -> V ;
define capitalg Г -> G ;
define capitald Д -> D ;
define capitalje Е -> E ;
define capitaljo Ё -> Ë ;
define capitalzh Ж -> Ž ;
define capitalzhd Җ -> Ẓ̌ ;
define capitalz З -> Z ;
define capitali И -> I ;
define capitalj Й -> J ;
define capitalk К -> K ;
define capitall Л -> L ;
define capitalm М -> M ;
define capitaln Н -> N ;
define capitalnj Ң -> Ņ ;
define capitalo О -> O ;
define capitaloo Ө -> Ô ;
define capitalp П -> P ;
define capitalr Р -> R ;
define capitals С -> S ;
define capitalt Т -> T ;
define capitalu У -> U ;
define capitaluu Ү -> Ù ;
define capitalf Ф -> F ;
define capitalx Х -> H ;
define capitalh Һ -> Ḩ ;
define capitalc Ц -> C ;
define capitalch Ч -> Č ;
define capitalsh Ш -> Š ;
define capitalshj Щ -> Ŝ ;
define capitalhard Ъ -> ” ;
define capitaly Ы -> Y ;
define capitalsoft Ь -> ’ ;
define capitale Э -> È ;
define capitalju Ю -> Û ;
define capitalja Я -> Â ;




 
read regex [ smalla
.o. smallae
.o. smallb
.o. smallv
.o. smallg
.o. smalld
.o. smallje
.o. smalljo
.o. smallzh
.o. smallzhd
.o. smallz
.o. smalli
.o. smallj
.o. smallk
.o. smalll
.o. smallm
.o. smalln
.o. smallnj
.o. smallo
.o. smalloo
.o. smallp
.o. smallr
.o. smalls
.o. smallt
.o. smallu
.o. smalluu
.o. smallf
.o. smallx
.o. smallh
.o. smallc
.o. smallch
.o. smallsh
.o. smallshj
.o. smallhard
.o. smally
.o. smallsoft
.o. smalle
.o. smallju
.o. smallja

.o. capitala
.o. capitalae
.o. capitalb
.o. capitalv
.o. capitalg
.o. capitald
.o. capitalje
.o. capitaljo
.o. capitalzh
.o. capitalzhd
.o. capitalz
.o. capitali
.o. capitalj
.o. capitalk
.o. capitall
.o. capitalm
.o. capitaln
.o. capitalnj
.o. capitalo
.o. capitaloo
.o. capitalp
.o. capitalr
.o. capitals
.o. capitalt
.o. capitalu
.o. capitaluu
.o. capitalf
.o. capitalx
.o. capitalh
.o. capitalc
.o. capitalch
.o. capitalsh
.o. capitalshj
.o. capitalhard
.o. capitaly
.o. capitalsoft
.o. capitale
.o. capitalju
.o. capitalja ] ;
